Hawaii statutes.
§612-3 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Circuit" refers to a judicial
circuit, as specified in section 603-1.

"Clerk" and "clerk of the
court" means the chief court administrator for a circuit, any authorized
deputy chief court administrator, and any other person designated by the chief
court administrator or the court to perform the functions under this chapter.

"Court" means the circuit and
district courts of this State, and includes, when the context requires, any
judge of the court. When there is an administrative judge, any administrative
powers granted by this chapter may be exercised by that judge or the judge's
designee, unless otherwise provided.

"Disability" means the state of
having a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of
a person's major life activities, having a record of such an impairment, or
being regarded as having such an impairment.

"Felony" means a crime as defined in
section 701-107(2).

"Jury wheel" means any physical
device or electronic system for the storage of the names or identifying numbers
of prospective jurors.

"Name", when used in connection with
prospective jurors, includes identifying numbers of the jurors. [L 1973, c 191,
pt of §1; am L 1976, c 159, §10; gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c 104, §1; am L 2007,
c 122, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next